District of Columbia statutes.
31-4801

Applicability of provisions.

Policies of industrial weekly payment life insurance after June 4, 1934, issued or delivered in the District of Columbia shall be subject to the following conditions, in addition to any others prescribed by law and not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

June 4, 1934, 48 Stat. 834, ch. 373, § 1
1981 Ed., § 35-901.
1973 Ed., § 35-1001.